code/xfst/tr-nom-example/tr-nom-example.lexc
Multichar_Symbols 
+N
+Sg
+Pl
+Poss1p
+Poss2p
+Poss3p
+NonPoss
+Nom
+Acc
+Dat
+Abl
+Loc

LEXICON Root

Noun;

LEXICON Noun

araba	NPos;
ev		NPos;
ütü		NPos;
gözlük	NPos;

LEXICON NPos

+N:0	Num;

LEXICON Num

+Sg:0		Agr;
+Pl:^lAr	Agr;

LEXICON Agr
	
+Poss1p:^Hm		Case;
+Poss2p:^Hn		Case;
+Poss3p:^SHN	Case;
+NonPoss:0		Case;

LEXICON Case

+Nom:0		#;
+Acc:^YH	#;
+Dat:^YA	#;
+Abl:^DAn	#;
+Loc:^DA	#;
